dictionary/da_DK-2.9.095.aff
FLAG num
#Adjektiv, -el og evt. dobbeltkonsonant erstattes med -lere og -lest
SFX 78 Y 205
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxz]el	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxz]el	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^b]bel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^c]cel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^d]del	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^f]fel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^g]gel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^h]hel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^j]jel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^k]kel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^l]lel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^m]mel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^n]nel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^p]pel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^q]qel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^r]rel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^s]sel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^t]tel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^v]vel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^w]wel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^x]xel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el lere/34 [^z]zel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^b]bel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^c]cel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^d]del	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^f]fel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^g]gel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^h]hel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^j]jel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^k]kel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^l]lel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^m]mel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^n]nel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^p]pel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^q]qel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^r]rel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^s]sel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^t]tel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^v]vel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^w]wel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^x]xel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el leres/34 [^z]zel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 bel lere/34 bbel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 cel lere/34 ccel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 del lere/34 ddel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 fel lere/34 ffel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 gel lere/34 ggel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 hel lere/34 hhel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 jel lere/34 jjel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 kel lere/34 kkel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 lel lere/34 llel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 mel lere/34 mmel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 nel lere/34 nnel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 pel lere/34 ppel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 qel lere/34 qqel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 rel lere/34 rrel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 sel lere/34 ssel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 tel lere/34 ttel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 vel lere/34 vvel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 wel lere/34 wwel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 xel lere/34 xxel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 zel lere/34 zzel	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 78 bel leres/34 bbel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 cel leres/34 ccel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 del leres/34 ddel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 fel leres/34 ffel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 gel leres/34 ggel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 hel leres/34 hhel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 jel leres/34 jjel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 kel leres/34 kkel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 lel leres/34 llel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 mel leres/34 mmel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 nel leres/34 nnel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 pel leres/34 ppel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 qel leres/34 qqel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 rel leres/34 rrel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 sel leres/34 ssel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 tel leres/34 ttel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 vel leres/34 vvel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 wel leres/34 wwel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 xel leres/34 xxel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 zel leres/34 zzel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lerest/34,90,89 [^bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxz]el	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxz]el	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxz]el	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^b]b	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^c]c	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^d]d	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^f]f	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^g]g	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^h]h	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^j]j	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^k]k	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^l]l	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^m]m	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^n]n	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^p]p	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^q]q	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^r]r	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^s]s	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^t]t	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^v]v	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^w]w	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^x]x	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el lest/34,90,89 [^z]z	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^b]bel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^c]cel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^d]del	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^f]fel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^g]gel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^h]hel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^j]jel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^k]kel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^l]lel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^m]mel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^n]nel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^p]pel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^q]qel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^r]rel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^s]sel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^t]tel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^v]vel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^w]wel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^x]xel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el leste/34,90,89 [^z]zel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^b]bel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^c]cel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^d]del	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^f]fel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^g]gel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^h]hel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^j]jel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^k]kel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^l]lel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^m]mel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^n]nel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^p]pel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^q]qel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^r]rel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^s]sel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^t]tel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^v]vel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^w]wel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^x]xel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 el lestes/34,90,89 [^z]zel	+GENITIV
SFX 78 bel lest/34,90,89 bbel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 cel lest/34,90,89 ccel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 del lest/34,90,89 ddel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 fel lest/34,90,89 ffel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 gel lest/34,90,89 ggel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 hel lest/34,90,89 hhel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 jel lest/34,90,89 jjel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 kel lest/34,90,89 kkel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 lel lest/34,90,89 llel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 mel lest/34,90,89 mmel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 nel lest/34,90,89 nnel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 pel lest/34,90,89 ppel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 qel lest/34,90,89 qqel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 rel lest/34,90,89 rrel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 sel lest/34,90,89 ssel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 tel lest/34,90,89 ttel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 vel lest/34,90,89 vvel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 wel lest/34,90,89 wwel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 xel lest/34,90,89 xxel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 zel lest/34,90,89 zzel	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 78 bel leste/34,90,89 bbel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 cel leste/34,90,89 ccel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 del leste/34,90,89 ddel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 fel leste/34,90,89 ffel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 gel leste/34,90,89 ggel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 hel leste/34,90,89 hhel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 jel leste/34,90,89 jjel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 kel leste/34,90,89 kkel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 lel leste/34,90,89 llel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 mel leste/34,90,89 mmel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 nel leste/34,90,89 nnel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 pel leste/34,90,89 ppel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 qel leste/34,90,89 qqel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 rel leste/34,90,89 rrel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 sel leste/34,90,89 ssel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 tel leste/34,90,89 ttel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 vel leste/34,90,89 vvel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 wel leste/34,90,89 wwel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 xel leste/34,90,89 xxel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 zel leste/34,90,89 zzel	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 78 bel lestes/34,90,89 bbel	+GENITIV
